Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6358.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 14. The bonds shall have all the qualities of are negotiable instruments as provided for in for purposes of the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.11102.440.12501. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 6347 (request no. H02809'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.